Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Unlawful Acts and Penalties.

Sec. 08.20.200.
Unlicensed practice.

A person who practices chiropractic in the state without a license in violation of AS

08.20.100

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and may be punished as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 1955; am § 8 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 15, 2016, inserted “class A” preceding “misdemeanor” and substituted “and may be punished as provided in AS 12.55” for “, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than a year, or by both”.

Collateral references. —

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Sec. 08.20.210.
Fraudulent licenses and certificates.

A person who obtains or attempts to obtain a chiropractic license or provides the board with evidence that the person is nationally certified to practice as a chiropractic clinical assistant by dishonest or fraudulent means or who forges, counterfeits, or fraudulently alters a chiropractic license or chiropractic clinical assistant certificate issued by a nationally recognized certification program is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and is punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 1955; am § 9 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 15, 2016, substituted “license or provides the board with evidence that the person is nationally certified to practice as a chiropractic clinical assistant” for “certificate”; inserted “license or chiropractic clinical assistant” following “alters a chiropractic”; inserted “issued by a nationally recognized certification program” between “certificate” and “is”; inserted “guilty of a class A misdemeanor and is” preceding “punishable”; substituted “as provided in AS 12.55” for “by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both”; and made a stylistic change.